Utah statutes.
10-3b-104.   Powers and duties of mayor in six-member council and five-
member council forms of government.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the mayor in a municipality
operating under a six-member council form of government or a five-member
council form of government:
(a)  is the chief executive officer of the municipality to whom all employees
of the municipality report;
(b)  shall:
(i)  keep the peace and enforce the laws of the municipality;
(ii)  ensure that all applicable statutes and municipal ordinances and
resolutions are faithfully executed and observed;
(iii)  if the mayor remits a fine or forfeiture under Subsection (1)(c)(ii),
report the remittance to the council at the council's next meeting after the
remittance;
(iv)  perform all duties prescribed by statute or municipal ordinance or
resolution;
(v)  report to the council the condition and needs of the municipality; and
(vi)  report to the council any release granted under Subsection (1)(c)(iv);
and
(c)  may:
(i)  recommend for council consideration any measure that the mayor considers
to be in the best interests of the municipality;
(ii)  remit fines and forfeitures;
(iii)  if necessary, call on residents of the municipality over the age of 21
years to assist in enforcing the laws of the state and ordinances of the
municipality;
(iv)  release a person imprisoned for a violation of a municipal ordinance;
(v)  with the council's advice and consent:
(A)  assign or appoint a member of the council to administer one or more
departments of the municipality; and
(B)  appoint a person to fill:
(I)  a municipal office; or
(II)  a vacancy on a commission or committee of the municipality; and
(vi)  at any reasonable time, examine and inspect the official books, papers,
records, or documents of:
(A)  the municipality; or
(B)  any officer, employee, or agency of the municipality.
(2)  The powers and duties in Subsection (1) are subject to:
(a)  municipal ordinances in effect on May 4, 2008 modifying the powers and
duties of the mayor; and
(b)  the council's authority to limit or expand the mayor's powers and duties
under:
(i)  Subsection 10-3b-303(2)(a), for a municipality operating under the six-
member council form of government; and
(ii)  Subsection 10-3b-403(2)(a), for a municipality operating under the five-
member council form of government.
